California, session 20252026, AB2713.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22757.3.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22757.3.1. (a) A large online platform shall do all of the following:(1) Detect whether any provenance data that is compliant with widely adopted specifications adopted by an established standards-setting body is embedded into or attached to is embedded into, attached to, or otherwise associated with content distributed on the large online platform.(2) (A) Provide a user interface to disclose the availability of system provenance data that reliably indicates that the whether content was generated or substantially altered by a GenAI system or captured by a capture device.(B) The user interface required by this paragraph shall make clearly and conspicuously available to users information sufficient to identify the content’s authenticity, origin, or history of modification, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(i) Whether provenance data is available. embedded into, attached to, or otherwise associated with the content.(ii) The name of the GenAI system or capture device that created or substantially altered the content, if applicable.(iii) Whether any digital signatures are available. embedded into, attached, to, or otherwise associated with the content.(3) Allow a user to inspect all available any system provenance data that is compliant with widely adopted specifications adopted by an established standards-setting body embedded into, attached to, or otherwise associated with the content in an easily accessible manner. The large online platform may satisfy this requirement by any of the following means:(A) Allow the user to inspect Displaying the system provenance data directly through the large online platform’s user interface pursuant to paragraph (2).(B) Providing a link to an internet website or other application that displays the system provenance data, including a website or application operated by a third party.(B)Allow the(C) Allowing a user to download a version of the content with its attached system provenance data, any provenance data embedded into, attached to, or otherwise associated with the content, subject to any applicable federal copyright laws. laws, in a format that cannot be easily embedded into, attached to, or associated with unrelated content.(C)Provide a link to the content’s system provenance data displayed on an internet website or in another application provided either by the large online platform or a third party.(b) A large online platform shall not, to the extent technically feasible, knowingly strip any system provenance data or digital signature that is compliant with widely adopted specifications adopted by an established standards-setting body from content uploaded or distributed on from content uploaded to, distributed on, or downloaded from the large online platform.(c) This section does not require a large online platform to take any action with respect to provenance data, system provenance data, or digital signatures that are not compliant with widely adopted specifications issued by an established standards-setting body.(c)(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.